Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-704] Records. (a) A
transportation network company shall maintain:

(1) Global positioning system records and electronic
records for each period while a transportation network company driver is logged
onto the transportation network company's digital network or software
application service or is engaged in a prearranged ride for at least five years
from the date each prearranged ride was provided; and

(2) Transportation network company driver records at
least until the five-year anniversary of the date on which a transportation
network company driver's activation on the transportation network company
digital network or software application service has ended.

(b) Records maintained under this section
shall be made readily available for purposes of an accident investigation
pursuant to section 431:10C-703(k) or resolving any other dispute related to transportation
network company drivers while they are logged onto the transportation network
company's digital network or software application service or while they are
engaged in a prearranged ride, no later than ten days after receipt of a
written request for such record. [L 2016, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next